Alaska, session 34, HB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 10.25.540 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (c) An electric cooperative is not subject to state and local ad valorem, 07 income, and excise taxes. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 10.25.570 is amended to read: 09 Sec. 10.25.570. Refund to local governments. The proceeds of the telephone 10 cooperative gross revenue tax [AND THE ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE TAX], less 11 the amount expended by the state in collecting the tax [THEIR COLLECTION], shall 12 be refunded to an organized borough or a city of any class incorporated under state 13 law, in the proportion that the revenue was earned within the city or the borough area 14 outside the city. However, taxes collected on gross revenue earned by a telephone 01 cooperative [OR ON THE SALE OF ELECTRICITY BY AN ELECTRIC 02 COOPERATIVE] outside a city or organized borough shall be retained by the state 03 and deposited into its general fund. 04 * Sec. 3. AS 42.45.310(f) is amended to read: 05 (f) Bonds and other obligations issued by the agency and all interest and 06 income from them and all fees, charges, funds, revenue, income, and other money 07 pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of the bonds or obligations or 08 interest on them are exempt from taxation. The real and personal property of the 09 agency and the assets, income, and receipts of the agency are exempt from all taxes 10 and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state [, EXCEPT 11 THAT ELECTRICITY SOLD AT RETAIL BY AN AGENCY IS SUBJECT TO THE 12 ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE TAX (AS 10.25.540 - 10.25.570)]. 13 * Sec. 4. AS 43.98.100(a) is amended to read: 14 (a) An electricity generation facility or electricity storage facility that is 15 constructed and placed into service on or after July 1, 2024, is not subject to state and 16 local ad valorem, income, and excise taxes if the [ELECTRICITY GENERATION] 17 facility is 18 (1) operated by a public utility or joint action agency established under 19 AS 42.45.310; or 20 (2) operated by an entity other than a public utility and provides power 21 (A) only to a public utility; or 22 (B) to an end user who was not receiving electric service 23 from a public utility on July 1, 2026. 24 * Sec. 5. AS 10.25.540(b)(2), 10.25.555, and 10.25.580 are repealed. 25 * Sec. 6. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.